Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB223.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 186.763 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Subject to the limitations in subsection (2) of this section, a person may operate a
fully autonomous vehicle on the highways of this state without a human driver
provided that the automated driving system is engaged and the vehicle meets the
following conditions:
(a) If a failure of the automated driving system occurs that renders that system
unable to perform the entire dynamic driving task relevant to its intended
operational design domain, the fully autonomous vehicle will achieve a
minimal risk condition;
(b) The fully autonomous vehicle is capable of operating in compliance with the
applicable traffic and motor vehicle safety laws and regulations of this state
when reasonable to do so, unless an exemption has been granted by the
Transportation Cabinet; and
(c) When required by federal law, the vehicle bears the required manufacturer's
certification label indicating that at the time of its manufacture it has been
certified to be in compliance with all applicable federal motor vehicle safety
standards, including any exemptions granted by the National Highway Traffic
Safety Administration.
(2) From July 15, 2024, until July 31, 2026, a fully autonomous vehicle for which the
declared gross weight of the vehicle and any towed unit is more than sixty-two
thousand (62,000) pounds shall have a human driver, with the appropriate
credentials to operate the vehicle, present in the vehicle to monitor the performance
of the vehicle and intervene if necessary.
(3) Prior to operating a fully autonomous vehicle on the highways of this state without
a human driver, a person shall submit a law enforcement interaction plan to the
Page 1 of 3
XXXX 9/15/2025 12:49 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 892
Transportation Cabinet and the Department of Kentucky State Police that describes:
(a) How to communicate with a fleet support specialist who is available during
the times the vehicle is in operation;
(b) How to safely remove the fully autonomous vehicle from the roadway and
steps to safely tow the vehicle;
(c) How to recognize whether the automated driving system is engaged on the
fully autonomous vehicle; and
(d) Any additional information the manufacturer or owner deems necessary
regarding hazardous conditions or public safety risks associated with the
operation of the fully autonomous vehicle.
(4) A school district shall not operate a fully autonomous vehicle as a school bus, as
defined in KRS 156.153, or use any fully autonomous vehicle to transport
students for any purpose.
(5) A person shall not operate a fully autonomous vehicle on the highways of this
state if the vehicle requires an operator with a commercial driver's license as
defined in KRS 281A.010.
Section 2. KRS 281.764 (Effective August 1, 2026) is amended to read as
follows:
(1) A motor carrier may operate a platoon on the highways of this state if the motor
carrier complies with this section.
(2) Motor carriers wishing to operate a platoon shall provide notification to the
department and the Department of Kentucky State Police, including a plan for
general platoon operations. The department shall have thirty (30) days from the date
of receipt to review the notification plan submitted and determine whether it will
approve or reject the plan. If the department rejects a submitted plan, it shall inform
the motor carrier of the reason for the rejection and provide guidance on how to
resubmit the notification and plan to meet the standards.
Page 2 of 3
XXXX 9/15/2025 12:49 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 892
(3) Only commercial motor vehicles shall be eligible to operate in a platoon.
(4) An appropriately endorsed driver who holds a valid commercial driver's license
shall be present behind the wheel of each[the lead] commercial motor vehicle in a
platoon.
(5) A commercial motor vehicle involved in a platoon shall not draw another motor
vehicle in the platoon.
(6) Each commercial motor vehicle involved in a platoon shall display a marking
warning other motorists and law enforcement that the vehicle may be part of a
platoon.
(7) The department shall promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with
KRS Chapter 13A to set forth procedures for platooning, including required
elements of a platooning plan.
Page 3 of 3
XXXX 9/15/2025 12:49 PM Jacketed